Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-412.01
Criminal cases; counties of 4,000 population or less; inadequate facilities; change of venue.

Any criminal case pending in either the county court or the district court in any county having a population of four thousand or less and not having adequate facilities for the trial of jury cases acceptable to the county and district judges may be tried in any adjoining county with the same effect as if tried in the county where the offense was committed.

Laws 1975, LB 97, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-901.